New York, session 2025-2026, A3565.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 505 of the correction law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 6 to read as follows: 3 6. County correction officers in local correctional facilities shall 4 not dispense or administer medications to incarcerated individuals on 5 the premises of a local correctional facility, as defined in subdivision 6 sixteen of section two of this chapter. This subdivision shall not, 7 however, impede county correction officers or staff from dispensing or 8 administering medications to incarcerated individuals during a medical 9 emergency, or from dispensing nonprescription medication. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 11 it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05102-07-6